dictsource/eu_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded
// Spelling-to-phoneme rules for Basque
// $w_alt j as [x]
// $w_alt2 don't palatalise l
	// $w_alt3 don't palatalise n

.L01 b d g
.L02 e i


.group a
        a          a
        ai         aI
        au         aU
        a (_S1     a
        ak (_S2    ak
        ari (_S3   ari
        aren (_S4  a**en
        arekin (_S6 a**ekin
        arentzat (_S8 a**entzat
        arentzako (_S9 arentzako
        an (_S2    an
        atik (_S4  atik
        ara (_S3   a**a
        arat (_S4  arat
        atatik (_S6 atatik
        atara (_S5 ata**a
        atarat (_S5 atarat
        ako (_S3   ako
        atako (_S5 atako
        araino (_S6 a**ain^o
        ataraino (_S8 ata**an^o
        arantz (_S6 a**antz
        atarantz (_S8 a**antz
        agana (_S5 agana
        arengana (_S8 a**engana
        arenganaino (_s11 a**enganain^o
        arengatik (_S9 a**engatik
        atzat (_S5 atzat
         
         

.group b
        b          b
  _ez_) b (A       p'
         

.group c
        c          k
        c (L02     T
        ch         tS        
         

.group d
        d          d
        dd         J
     A) d (A       D         // ??
  _ez_) d (A       t'
         
         
         

.group e
        e          e
        ei         eI
        ehi        eI
     l) ehi (A     eI
        eu         eU
        ek (_S2    ek
        ei (_S2    eI
        en (_S2    en
        ean (_S3   ean
        etan (_S4  etan
        etatik (_S6 etatik
        etara (_S5 eta**a
        erat (_S4  erat
        etako (_S5 etako
        eko (_S3   eko
        etarako (_S7 etarako
        etarantz (_S8 eta**antz
        etaraino (_S8 eta**aino
        engana (_S6 engana
        entzat (_S6 entzat
        entzako (_S7 entzako
        engatik (S7 engatik
        ekin (_S4  ekin
        ekiko (_S5 ekiko
        ez (_S2    ez
        etaz (_S4  etaz
         
         

.group f
        f          f
         
         

.group g
        g          g
     A) g (A       Q         // ??
  _ez_) g (A       k'
        gana (_S4  gana
        go (_S2    go
         

.group h
        h                    // silent
    zi) h (o       x
         
         

.group i
        i          i
     K) i (_S1     i
    le) i (h       j
 arraz) i (on      j
         

.group j
        j          J         //  try [x] [J] [j] [J^] [Z] [S]
        j ($w_alt  x

         
         

.group k
        k          k
        ko (_S2    ko
         
         

.group l
        l          l
        ll         l^
  _ez_) l (A       l'
        l ($w_alt2 l2       _afi) l (ia l2

.group m
        m          m


.group n
        n          n
        n (_S1     n
        n ($w_alt3 n2mi)    n (is n2
   afi) n (i       n2
agluti) n (A       n2
  alpi) n (A       n2

.group o
        o          o
        oi         oI
         
         

.group p
        p          p
         
         

.group q
        q          k
         
         

.group r
        r          r
     _) r          R2
        rr         R2
     A) ri (_S2    ri
        ren (_S3   ren
        ra (_S2    ra
        rat (_S3   rat
        rantz (_S5 rantz
        raino (_S5 raino
        rako (_S4  rako
        rentzat (_S7 rentzat
        rentzako (_S8 rentzako
        rekin (_S5 rekin
        rengan (_S6 rengan
        rengana (_S7 rengana
        rengandik (_S9 rengandik
        rengatik (_S8 rengatik

         
         

.group s
        s          s
         
         

.group t
        t          t
        ts         ts
        tt         c
        tx         tS
        tz         tz
        tan (_S3   tan
        tara (_S4  tara
        tarat (_S5 tarat
        tik (_S3   tik
        tatik (_S5 tatik
        taz (_S3   taz
        tu (_S2    tu
        tuko (_S4  tuko
        tzen (_S4  tzen
        ten (_S3   ten
         
         

.group u
        u          u
         
         

.group v
        v          b
         
         

.group w
        w          u
         
         

.group x
        x          S
         
         

.group y
        y          jj
         

.group z
        z          z
    _e) z (_L01    %z
    _e) z (_l 
        z (_S1     z
         

.group
        á          ''a
        é          ''e
        í          ''i
        ó          ''o
        ú          ''u
        ç          s
        ü          y
        ñ          n^
         
